Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.200

Revenue bonds—Limitations.

(1) A public facilities district may issue revenue bonds to fund revenue generating facilities, or portions of facilities, which it is authorized to provide or operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the board of directors of the district shall create or have created a special fund or funds from which, along with any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and interest on such revenue bonds shall exclusively be payable. The board may obligate the district to set aside and pay into the special fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of the revenues from the public improvements, projects, or facilities, and all related additions, that are funded by the revenue bonds. This amount or proportion shall be a lien and charge against these revenues, subject only to operating and maintenance expenses. The board shall have due regard for the cost of operation and maintenance of the public improvements, projects, or facilities, or additions, that are funded by the revenue bonds, and shall not set aside into the special fund or funds a greater amount or proportion of the revenues that in its judgment will be available over and above the cost of maintenance and operation and the amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue so previously pledged. The board may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being issued and sold.

(2) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be an indebtedness of the district issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall only be payable from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The owner or bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section shall not have any claim against the district arising from the bond or coupon except for payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each bond issued pursuant to this section.

(3) Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of thirty years shall not be issued. The board of directors of the district shall by resolution determine for each revenue bond issue the amount, date, form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of existing revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as revenue bonds are issued.

[ 1995 c 396 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.

Alternative authority to issue revenue bonds: RCW 39.46.150, 39.46.160.

Funds for reserve purposes may be included in issue amount: RCW 39.44.140.